Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF1400.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 179A.06, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. Right to organize. (a) Public employees have the right to form and join labor or employee organizations, and have the right not to form and join such organizations. Public employees in an appropriate unit have the right by secret ballot to designate an exclusive representative to negotiate grievance procedures and the terms and conditions of employment with their employer. Confidential employees of the state, confidential court employees, and confidential University of Minnesota employees are excluded from bargaining. Supervisory and managerial court employees are excluded from bargaining. Supervisory, managerial, and confidential employees of Hennepin Healthcare System, Inc., are excluded from bargaining. Other confidential employees, supervisory employees, principals, and assistant principals may form their own organizations. An employer shall extend exclusive recognition to a representative of or an organization of supervisory or confidential employees, or principals and assistant principals, for the purpose of negotiating terms or conditions of employment, in accordance with sections 179A.01 to 179A.25, applicable to essential employees. (b) Supervisory or confidential employee organizations shall not participate in any capacity in any negotiations which involve units of employees other than supervisory or confidential employees. Except for organizations which represent supervisors who aredeleted text begin : (1)deleted text end firefighters, emergency medical service employees certified under section 144E.28, 911 system public safety dispatchers, peace officers subject to licensure under sections 626.84 to 626.863, guards at correctional facilities, or employees at hospitals other than state hospitalsdeleted text begin ; and (2) not state or University of Minnesota employeesdeleted text end , a supervisory or confidential employee organization which is affiliated with another employee organization which is the exclusive representative of nonsupervisory or nonconfidential employees of the same public employer shall not be certified, or act as, an exclusive representative for the supervisory or confidential employees. For the purpose of this subdivision, affiliation means either direct or indirect and includes affiliation through a federation or joint body of employee organizations.